src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! ======================= !
! Amharic morphology file !
! ======================= !

Multichar_Symbols 

^[ ^] 
 +Msc +Fem
+Perf    +Impf   +Ger +Inf Cau+
+Nominal +Fut +Gen
+1P+ +2P+ +3P+ +Sg+ +Pl+ 
  +Sg +Pl    +Def  +InDef  +Nom +Acc
+3P
Sg+ Pl+
+1P +2P +3P 



@U.imp.Im@
@U.verb.Ger@
@U.verb.Im@
@U.verb.Nmn@
@U.verb.Perf@
@U.verb.1Pp@
@U.verb.1Psp@
@U.verb.2Pp@
@U.verb.3Pp@
@U.verb.3fsp@
@U.verb.3msp@








LEXICON Root
	Nominals ;
	Verbs ;
	

! ======================================== !
!                  Nominals                !
! ======================================== !

LEXICON Nominals
	 Possessive ;
	 NounsAdjectives ;

LEXICON Possessive
yä 	NounsAdjectives ;  !Adjectives and nouns have the same form they do inflectin the way
	 

	 
LEXICON NounsAdjectives	
lj	    NNumber ; !regular
Xähy	NNumber ;	
qonjo	ANumber ;
räjm	ANumber ;
wuha	NDefiniteness ; 	!uncountable
 
LEXICON NNumber
+N: Number ;

LEXICON ANumber
+A: Number ;

LEXICON NDefiniteness
+N: Definiteness ;

!Post root morphology
	 
LEXICON Number
+Sg:	Gender ;
+Pl:oč	Definiteness ;

LEXICON Gender
+Msc:	Definiteness ;
+Fem:it	Definiteness ;
 
LEXICON Definiteness
+Def:u	Case ;
+InDef:	   # ;

LEXICON Case
+Nom:	 # ;
+Acc:n	# ;            !+Def is a prerequisite for +Acc(+InDef+Accis out)

!there are few nouns which are inherently  gender assigned becasue of their near contact witht the language speaking community ; since thier number is very limited I prefer to list them than to include in the derivation:
! +Msc : bäre,korma, bal , awra, kiräne
!+Fem: lam, bazra, gidär, mist, k'eb



 
! ======================================== !
!                    Verbs
! ======================================== !


LEXICON Verbs	
	ImPerfc ;	
	Nominalizer ;
	Causative ;
		
LEXICON ImPerfc    !the function of these prefixes is not clear yet
< 0:y   "+3P+":0 "Sg+":0 "@U.verb.3msp@" >	Ca ;   
< 0:t   "+3P+":0 "Sg+":0 "@U.verb.3fsp@" >	Ca ;
< 0:y   "+3P+":0 "Pl+":0 "@U.verb.3Pp@"  >	Ca ;
< 0:t   "+2P+":0         "@U.verb.2Pp@"  >	Ca ;
< 0:X   "+1P+":0         "@U.verb.1Psp@" >	Ca ;  
< 0:X 0:n "+1P+":0         "@U.verb.1Pp@"  >	Ca ;

LEXICON Ca
@U.imp.Im@    Causativ ;  ! the causative caused the imperfect prefixes 
              LBound ;          ! to be optional which is bad

LEXICON Causativ !I add this lexicon to avoid the conflict of the prefixes and the causative
Cau+:as       LBound ;

LEXICON Nominalizer
+Nominal+@U.verb.Nmn@:mä@U.verb.Nmn@	Causative ;		
	   

LEXICON Causative   	    
		                     LBound ;  
		                     LBoundf ;
		
LEXICON LBoundf     !verbs with 4-consonant roots(f=four)
[:^[{ Rootsf ;

LEXICON Rootsf   
zkzk 	RightMerg ;  
mnzr	RightMerg ;
 
LEXICON RightMerg
-:}.m%>.{ Templatef ; 

LEXICON Templatef
CäCäCC  Im_Boundf ;
CäCäCäC	Perf_Boundf ;
CäCCC   Ger_Boundf ;
CäCCäC	Nmn_Boundf ;

LEXICON  Im_Boundf
]:}^] 	Imperfect ;

LEXICON Perf_Boundf
]:}^] 	Gersubject ;

LEXICON   Ger_Boundf
]:}^] 	Persubject ;

LEXICON Nmn_Boundf
]:}^] 	Infinitive ;


				 				
LEXICON LBound     !verbs with 3-consonant roots
[:^[{ Roots ;

LEXICON Roots    
lbs MergeRight ;
drs MergeRight ;
gdl MergeRight ;
Xrs MergeRight ; 	!verbs that begin with 'a'(lost X at the begining)
lkX MergeRight ;	!verbs that lost 'X' at the end
sXl MergeRight ;	!verbs that lost 'X' at the mid position
mhl MergeRight ;	!verbs that lost 'h' at the mid
frh MergeRight ;	!verbs that lost 'h' at the end,,, 

LEXICON MergeRight
-:}.m%>.{ Template ; 

LEXICON Template    ! Here we expect 3-letter roots
CäCC 	Im_Bound ;	
CäCäC	Perf_Bound ;
CäCC	Ger_Bound ; !the ä is an underlying form, i
CCäC    Nmn_Bound ;     !t appears as a when there is consonant deletion


LEXICON  Im_Bound
]:}^] 	Imperfect ;

LEXICON Perf_Bound
]:}^] 	Gersubject ;

LEXICON   Ger_Bound
]:}^] 	Persubject ;

LEXICON Nmn_Bound
]:}^] 	Infinitive ;



LEXICON All
	Imperfect  ;
	Gersubject ;
	Persubject ;
	Infinitive ;
	  
LEXICON Imperfect
@U.imp.Im@     Impsubject ;

LEXICON  Impsubject
< 0:a 0:l 0:u       "+1P":0                  "@U.verb.1Pp@"  > # ;
< 0:a 0:l 0:ä 0:h 0:u   "+1P":0 "+Sg":0          "@U.verb.1Psp@" > # ;
< 0:a 0:l 0:ä 0:n     "+1P":0 "+Pl":0          "@U.verb.1Pp@"  > # ;
< 0:a 0:l 0:a 0:č 0:h 0:u "+2P":0 "+Pl":0          "@U.verb.2Pp@"  > # ;
< 0:a 0:l 0:ä 0:h     "+2P":0 "+Sg":0 "+Msc":0 "@U.verb.2Pp@"  > # ;	
< 0:a 0:l 0:ä 0:š     "+2P":0 "+Sg":0 "+Fem":0 "@U.verb.2Pp@"  > # ;
< 0:a 0:l         "+3P":0 "+Sg":0 "+Msc":0 "@U.verb.3msp@" > # ;   !problem
< 0:a 0:l 0:ä 0:č     "+3P":0 "+Sg":0 "+Fem":0 "@U.verb.3fsp@" > # ;
 

LEXICON Gersubject
@U.verb.Ger@  GSubject ;

LEXICON GSubject
+3P+Msc+Sg:o	# ;
+3P+Fem+Sg:a	# ;
+3P+Pl:äw	# ;
+2P+Msc+Sg:äh   # ;
+2P+Fem+Sg:äš	# ;
+2P+Pl:ačhu	# ;	!there might be a phonological process here, dialects
+1P+Sg:e	# ;

LEXICON Persubject
@U.verb.Perf@ PSubject ;

LEXICON PSubject
+3P+Msc+Sg:ä	# ;
+3P+Fem+Sg:äč	# ;
+3P+Pl:u	# ;
+2P+Msc+Sg:h	# ;	! h alternates with k
+2P+Fem+Sg:š	# ;
+2P+Pl:ačhu	# ;
+1P+Sg:hu	# ;	!hu alternates with ku

LEXICON Infinitive
+Nominal:       # ; 	

!I have three main problems now(resulting in an unexpected large number of output.)
!1. Underlying forms are exploding in the output,in all the forms,  which is bad       ?????
!2. Imperfect prefixes have been optional because of the optionality of the causatives.?????
!3. Replace rules are failing, 2nd round ?
!technical
!avoiding the flags from showing up in xfst <--solved
!latin to amharic <---------solved
